Utah statutes.
30-1-2.   Marriages prohibited and void.
The following marriages are prohibited and declared void:
(1)  when there is a husband or wife living, from whom the person marrying has
not been divorced;
(2)  when the male or female is under 18 years of age unless consent is
obtained as provided in Section 30-1-9;
(3)  when the male or female is under 14 years of age or, beginning May 3,
1999, when the male or female is under 16 years of age at the time the parties
attempt to enter into the marriage; however, exceptions may be made for a
person 15 years of age, under conditions set in accordance with Section
30-1-9;
(4)  between a divorced person and any person other than the one from whom the
divorce was secured until the divorce decree becomes absolute, and, if an
appeal is taken, until after the affirmance of the decree; and
(5)  between persons of the same sex.
